Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Chapter 16 Motor Vehicle Franchises
§ 31-16-108.
Unlawful acts.

No vehicle dealer or other person required to be licensed under this act, or any salesperson or agent shall:

Knowingly publish or circulate any misleading or inaccurate advertisement which misrepresents any of the products sold or furnished by a licensed dealer or use any false or misleading advertisement in the conduct of its business;

Violate this act or any of the rules and regulations promulgated under it;

Knowingly purchase, sell, acquire or dispose of a stolen vehicle;

Violate any law of this state respecting commerce in vehicles or any state agency rule or regulation;

Engage in the business for which a dealer is licensed without maintaining a principal place of business as required by this act;

Engage in a type of business respecting the sale or exchange of new or new and used vehicles for which he is not licensed;

Knowingly purchase a vehicle which has an altered or removed vehicle identification number or to alter or remove a vehicle identification number plate;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 154, § 3.

Violate any provision of the federal motor vehicle safety standards;

Display for sale, exchange or sell any new motor vehicle for which the vehicle dealer does not hold a valid franchise;

Import, display for sale, exchange, or sell, any new vehicle, or any used vehicle originally sold by a manufacturer for distribution outside the United States unless the vehicle is in compliance with all federal regulations governing vehicles that were manufactured for distribution outside the United States and subsequently imported into the United States. Any dealer required to be licensed under this act shall maintain records in his principal place of business necessary to verify compliance with this provision if requested by the department or any law enforcement officer;

Advertise, display, demonstrate, exchange or sell any vehicle with less than one thousand (1,000) miles on the odometer, unless the person is a properly licensed dealer, or the person has obtained a valid Wyoming title in his name or business name and has paid the applicable sales or use tax on the vehicle in his name before advertising, displaying, demonstrating, exchanging or selling the vehicle.

No manufacturer licensed under this act shall require or coerce or attempt to require or coerce any new vehicle dealer in this state:

To order or accept delivery of any new vehicle, vehicle part or accessory, equipment or any other commodity not required by law which the new vehicle dealer has not voluntarily ordered. This paragraph does not modify or supersede any terms or provisions of the franchise requiring new vehicle dealers to market a representative line of the vehicles covered by the franchise, to promote the sale, leasing and rental of the vehicles and to carry a reasonable inventory of models offered for sale by the manufacturer;

To order or accept delivery of any new vehicle with special features, accessories or equipment not included in the list price of those vehicles as publicly advertised by the manufacturer or distributor unless they are required by law;

To participate monetarily in an advertising campaign or contest or to purchase any promotional materials, training materials, showroom or other display decorations or materials at the expense of the new vehicle dealer. This paragraph does not modify any provisions of the franchise requiring the dealer to advertise and promote the sale of vehicles covered by the franchise and does not apply to campaigns, contests, advertising and other promotional programs in which the dealer voluntarily participates;

To enter into any agreement with the manufacturer or to prejudice the new vehicle dealer by threatening to terminate or cancel a franchise or any contractual agreement existing between the dealer and the manufacturer. This paragraph does not preclude the manufacturer or distributor from insisting on compliance with the reasonable terms or provisions of the franchise or other contractual agreement. Notice in good faith from a manufacturer or distributor to any new vehicle dealer of the new vehicle dealer’s violation of those terms or provisions does not constitute a violation of this act;

To change the capital structure of the new vehicle dealer or the new vehicle dealer’s financing means if the new vehicle dealer meets any reasonable capital standards determined by the manufacturer in accordance with uniformly applied criteria. A new vehicle dealer may change its capital structure in accordance with reasonable capital standards if the change does not change the principal management or ownership in whole or in part or result in the sale of the franchise. If a change in capital structure results in a sale of the franchise, the manufacturer or distributor may not unreasonably withhold any necessary consent to the change;

To refrain from participation in the management of, investment in or the acquisition of any other line of new vehicle or related products. This paragraph does not apply unless the new vehicle dealer maintains a reasonable line of credit for each make or line of new vehicle, the new vehicle dealer remains in compliance with any reasonable facilities and other franchise requirements of the manufacturer and no change is made in the principal management of the new vehicle dealer;

To prospectively agree to relieve any person from liability imposed by this law or to require any controversy between a new vehicle dealer and a manufacturer, distributor or their representatives, to be referred to any person other than the duly constituted courts of the state or the United States, or to the director if the referral would be binding upon the new vehicle dealer;

To establish, after becoming a new vehicle dealer, exclusive facilities, personnel or display space for a line make when such requirements would not be justified by reasonable business considerations;

To expand facilities without making available a sufficient supply of new vehicles to justify an expansion considering the market and economic conditions;

To modify significantly an existing dealership or to construct a new vehicle dealership facility without a sufficient supply of new vehicles to justify a modification or construction considering the market and economic conditions.

No manufacturer licensed under this act shall:

Delay, refuse or fail to deliver new vehicles or new vehicle parts or accessories in a reasonable time and quantity relative to the new vehicle dealer’s facilities and sales potential in the new vehicle dealer’s relevant market area after acceptance of an order from a new vehicle dealer having a franchise for the retail sale of any new vehicle sold or distributed by the manufacturer, any new vehicle, parts or accessories to new vehicles as are covered by the franchise, if the vehicle, parts or accessories are publicly advertised as being available for delivery or actually delivered. Failure caused by acts or causes beyond the control of the manufacturer is not a violation of this act;

Refuse to disclose to any new vehicle dealer handling the same line make the manner and mode of distribution of the line make within the relevant market area;

Without the consent of the dealer, obtain money, goods, services or other benefit from a person who does business with the new vehicle dealer in relation to the transaction between the new vehicle dealer and the person other than as compensation for services rendered and products provided, unless the benefit is promptly transmitted or credited to the new vehicle dealer;

Increase prices of new vehicles ordered by the new vehicle dealer for consumers prior to the new vehicle dealer’s receipt of the written official price increase notification. A sales contract signed by a consumer is evidence of each order if the vehicle is delivered to the customer. In the event of manufacturer price reductions or cash rebates paid to the new vehicle dealer intended by the manufacturer to be passed on to the consumer, the amount of any reduction or rebate received by a new vehicle dealer passes to the private retail consumer by the new vehicle dealer. Price reductions apply to all unused, undamaged and unsold vehicles in the dealer’s inventory which were subject to the price reduction. Price differences applicable to a new model or series are not a price increase or price decrease. Price changes caused by the following are not subject to this paragraph:

The addition to a vehicle of required or optional equipment or a change in the capacity, performance, size, weight or design specifications of a vehicle;

Changes in the rate of exchange of the United States dollar, in the case of foreign-made vehicles or components; and

An increase in transportation charges due to increased rates imposed by a carrier.

Release to any other party, except under subpoena or as otherwise required by law or in an administrative, judicial or arbitration proceeding involving the manufacturer or new vehicle dealer, any business, financial, or personal information which is provided by the new vehicle dealer to the manufacturer without the express written consent of the new vehicle dealer;

Deny any new vehicle dealer the right of free association with any other new vehicle dealer for any lawful purpose;

Unfairly compete with a new vehicle dealer in the same line make and operating under an agreement or franchise from the manufacturer in the relevant market area. A manufacturer is not competing when operating a dealership either temporarily for a reasonable period or in a bona fide retail operation which is for sale to any qualified independent person at a fair and reasonable price, or in a bona fide relationship in which an independent person has made a significant investment subject to loss in the dealership and can reasonably expect to acquire full ownership of such dealership on reasonable terms and conditions;

Unfairly discriminate among its new vehicle dealers with respect to warranty reimbursement;

Unreasonably withhold consent to the sale, transfer or exchange of the franchise to a qualified buyer capable of being licensed as a new vehicle dealer in this state;

Fail to respond in writing to a request for consent as specified in paragraph (ix) of this subsection within sixty (60) days of receipt of a written request. Failure to respond within the time specified is consent to the request;

Prevent or attempt to prevent any new vehicle dealer from changing the executive management control of the new vehicle dealer unless the manufacturer shows the change of executive management will result in executive management or control by a person who is not of good moral character or who does not meet reasonable, preexisting and, with consideration given to the volume of sales and service of the dealership, uniformly applied minimum business experience standards. This paragraph does not prevent a manufacturer or distributor from withholding consent based upon the prospective buyer’s character, automotive experience, capital and other reasonable qualifications for appointment as a dealer, and the effect of the proposed transaction upon competition. If the manufacturer rejects a proposed change in executive management control, written notice of his reasons shall be given to the dealer within sixty (60) days of notice to the manufacturer by the dealer of the proposed change or the change in the executive management of the new vehicle dealer shall be presumptively deemed approved;

Terminate, cancel or fail to renew any franchise solely because of the death or incapacity of an owner who is not listed in the franchise as one on whose expertise and abilities the manufacturer relied in granting the franchise;

Prevent or attempt to prevent the new vehicle dealer from receiving the fair market value of the dealership in a sale transaction or from transferring the new vehicle dealership to a spouse or legal heir as specified in this act;

Engage in any predatory practice or discrimination against any new vehicle dealer;

Use any false or misleading advertisement in the conduct of his business as a manufacturer or distributor in this state;

Make any false or misleading statement, either directly or through any agent or employee, to induce any new vehicle dealer to enter into any agreement or franchise.

No manufacturer or any officer, agent or representative shall coerce or attempt to coerce any new vehicle dealer in this state to sell, assign or transfer any retail installment sales contract obtained by the dealer in connection with the sale by him in this state of new vehicles manufactured or sold by the manufacturer to a specified finance company, class of companies or to any other specified person.

Any statement, threats, promises, acts, contracts or offers of contracts which lessen or eliminate competition or tend to create a monopoly are unfair trade practices, unfair methods of competition and are prohibited.

No manufacturer or agent or employee of a manufacturer shall use a written instrument, agreement or waiver to attempt to nullify any of the provisions of this section. Any such agreement, written instrument or waiver is null and void.

No person shall directly or indirectly impose unreasonable restrictions on the new vehicle dealer relative to the sale, transfer, right to renew, termination, discipline, noncompetition covenants, site control (whether by sublease, collateral pledge of lease, or otherwise), right of first refusal to purchase, option to purchase, compliance with subjective standards and assertion of legal or equitable rights.

This act applies to all written franchise agreements between a manufacturer and a new vehicle dealer, including but not limited to, the franchise offering, the franchise agreement, sales of goods, services or advertising, promises to pay, security interests, pledges, insurance contracts, advertising contracts, construction or installation contracts, servicing contracts and all other agreements where the manufacturer has any direct or indirect interest.

No motor vehicle manufacturer or distributor licensed under this act, directly or indirectly, shall offer to sell or sell new motor vehicles to a consumer except through a new vehicle dealer who holds a valid sales and service agreement, franchise, or contract granted by the manufacturer, distributor or wholesaler for the sale of its motor vehicles. This subsection shall not apply to a licensed direct sale manufacturer, sales to affiliates of the manufacturer, distributor or wholesaler, sales to the federal government, charitable organizations or sales to employees of the manufacturer, distributor or wholesaler.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1; 1997, ch. 154, § 3; 2000, ch. 82, § 1; 2001, ch. 24, § 1; 2017 ch. 208, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (j) added “a licensed direct sale manufacturer” following “shall not apply to” in the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 31-16-101(a)(xx).

§ 31-16-109.
Termination, cancellation or nonrenewal of franchise.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions or conditions of any franchise or waiver, no manufacturer shall cancel, terminate or fail to renew any franchise with a licensee unless the manufacturer has satisfied the notice requirement of subsection (b) of this section and has good cause for cancellation, termination or nonrenewal.

Prior to the termination, cancellation or nonrenewal of any franchise, the manufacturer shall furnish notification of termination, cancellation or nonrenewal to the department and the licensee:

Not less than ninety (90) days prior to the effective date of the termination, cancellation or nonrenewal;

Not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the effective date of the termination, cancellation or nonrenewal with respect to any of the following which shall constitute good cause for cancellation, termination or nonrenewal:

Insolvency of the licensee, or filing of any petition by or against the licensee under any bankruptcy or receivership law;

Failure of the licensee to conduct sales and service operations during customary business hours for seven (7) consecutive business days, except for acts of God or circumstances beyond the direct control of the licensee;

Conviction of the dealer, or any owner or principal manager of the dealer in a court of original jurisdiction of a felony or any crime involving theft, dishonesty or false statement;

Revocation of any license which the licensee is required to have to operate a dealership;

A fraudulent misrepresentation by the new motor vehicle dealer to the manufacturer, which is material to the franchise; or

Not less than one hundred eighty (180) days prior to the effective date of the termination or cancellation, where the manufacturer is discontinuing the sale of the product line.

Notification under this section shall be in writing, by certified mail or personally delivered to the licensee and shall state the intention to terminate, cancel or not to renew the franchise, reasons for the termination, cancellation or nonrenewal and the date on which the termination, cancellation or nonrenewal takes effect.

Good cause for termination, cancellation or nonrenewal of a franchise shall include but not be limited to:

Failure by the licensee to comply with a provision of the franchise, which is both reasonable and of material significance to the franchise relationship, provided that the dealer has been notified in writing of the failure within one hundred eighty (180) days prior to termination, cancellation or nonrenewal;

Failure of the licensee to comply with reasonable performance criteria established by the manufacturer if the licensee was apprised by the manufacturer in writing of the failure and:

The notification stated that notice was provided of failure of performance pursuant to this section;

The licensee was afforded a reasonable opportunity, for a period of not less than six (6) months, to comply with the criteria; and

The licensee did not demonstrate substantial compliance with the performance criteria of the manufacturer during such period.

Within twenty (20) days of receiving the notice or within twenty (20) days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the manufacturer, the dealer may file with the department to protest the termination, cancellation or nonrenewal. When a protest is filed, the department shall inform the manufacturer that a timely protest has been filed. The manufacturer shall have twenty (20) days to respond to the protest. The manufacturer shall not terminate, cancel or nonrenew the franchise until the department has held a hearing and determined that there is good cause for permitting the termination, cancellation or nonrenewal.

The department will select a hearing examiner to conduct a hearing and to render proposed findings of fact. The proposed findings of fact shall be conclusive unless clearly erroneous and unsupported by the record. The hearing shall be conducted and the department shall render its final determination within one hundred twenty (120) days after the manufacturer responds to the licensee’s protest. The department may forbid the termination, cancellation or nonrenewal of the franchise if it is determined good cause does not exist.

All costs of the department, including but not limited to, the cost of the investigation, the cost of the hearing examiner and the cost of preparing the record, shall be borne equally by the parties. The department may, in its discretion, award costs to the prevailing party in any hearing held pursuant to this chapter provided, however, if the department should determine by a preponderance of the evidence, that the protest is without merit, it shall award costs and reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing party.

The manufacturer shall have the burden of proof under this section.

Upon the termination, nonrenewal or cancellation of any franchise by the manufacturer pursuant to this section, the licensee shall be allowed fair and reasonable compensation by the manufacturer for the:

New vehicle inventory which is unused, undamaged, unsold and acquired from the manufacturer within the prior twelve (12) months and prior to the dealer receiving notice of termination;

Supplies and parts which are unused, undamaged, unsold and in original packaging and have been acquired from the manufacturer prior to the dealer receiving notice of termination and are listed in the manufacturer’s current parts catalog or price list;

Equipment and furnishings purchased from the manufacturer or its approved sources in order to comply with the dealer’s obligations under the franchise; and

Special tools acquired from the manufacturer or a source approved by the manufacturer which were recommended by the manufacturer in writing and are in good and usable condition, except for reasonable wear and tear.

Fair and reasonable compensation under subsection (j) of this section shall be paid or credited by the manufacturer within ninety (90) days of the tender of the property, provided the licensee has clear title to the inventory and other items and is in a position to convey that title to the manufacturer.

In the event of a termination, cancellation or nonrenewal by the manufacturer under this section, except as provided in subparagraph (b)(ii)(C) of this section, the manufacturer shall pay:

A sum equivalent to rent of the unexpired term of the lease or one (1) year rent based upon reasonable rental value, whichever is less, if the motor vehicle dealer is leasing its motor vehicle dealership facility from a lessor other than manufacturers or distributors; or

A sum equivalent to reasonable rental value of the dealership facility for one (1) year or the reasonable rental value of the facility until facilities are leased or sold, whichever is less, if the motor vehicle dealer owns the motor vehicle dealer facility.

The rental payment required under subsection (m) of this section is only required to the extent that the facilities were used for the sale and service of the manufacturer’s or distributor’s product, and only to the extent they are not leased for other purposes. Payment under subsection (k) of this section entitles the manufacturer or distributor to possession and use of the facility.

This section shall not relieve a new motor vehicle dealer, lessor or other owner of an established place of business from the obligation to mitigate damages.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-16-110.
Succession to franchise ownership.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions or conditions of any franchise:

Any owner or a licensee may appoint by will, or any other written instrument, a designated family member to succeed in the ownership interest of the owner in the new vehicle dealer;

Unless there exists good cause for refusal to honor succession by the manufacturer, any designated family member of a deceased or incapacitated owner of a new vehicle dealer may succeed to the ownership of the new vehicle dealer under the existing franchise if:

The designated family member gives the manufacturer written notice of intent to succeed to the ownership of the new vehicle dealer within thirty (30) days of the owner’s death or incapacity; and

The designated family member agrees to be bound by all the terms and conditions of the franchise.

The manufacturer may request and the designated family member shall promptly provide personal and financial data reasonably necessary to determine whether the succession should be honored;

If a manufacturer believes good cause exists for refusing to honor the succession to the ownership of a new vehicle dealer by a family member of a deceased or incapacitated owner of a new vehicle dealer under the existing franchise agreement, the manufacturer may serve upon the designated family member and the department notice of its refusal to honor the succession and of its intent to discontinue the existing franchise with the dealer no sooner than sixty (60) days from the date the notice is served. The notice may only be served not more than sixty (60) days following receipt of:

Notice of the designated family member’s intent to succeed to the ownership of the new vehicle dealer; or

Any personal or financial data which it has requested.

The notice in paragraph (iv) of this subsection shall state the specific grounds for the refusal to honor the succession and of its intent to discontinue the existing franchise with the new vehicle dealer no sooner than sixty (60) days from the date the notice is served;

If notice of refusal and discontinuance is not timely served upon the family member, the franchise shall continue in effect subject to termination only as otherwise permitted under this act;

Within twenty (20) days of receiving the notice after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the manufacturer, the designated family member may file with the department to protest the refusal to honor the successor. When such a protest is filed, the department shall inform the manufacturer that a timely protest has been filed and the manufacturer has sixty (60) days to respond to the protest after actually being informed by the department of the protest. The manufacturer shall not terminate or discontinue the existing franchise until the department has held a hearing under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and determined that there is good cause for not permitting the succession. All hearing costs shall be borne as prescribed under W.S. 31-16-109(g);

In determining whether good cause for the refusal to honor the succession exists, the manufacturer or importer has the burden of proof;

This act does not preclude the owner of a new vehicle dealer from designating any person as his successor by written instrument filed with the manufacturer. If there is a conflict between the written instrument and this section and the written instrument has not been revoked by the owner of the new dealer in writing to the manufacturer the written instrument shall govern;

As used in this section, “manufacturer” includes a manufacturer, a distributor, a factory branch, distributor branch or other representative.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(vi) and in the first sentence in subsection (a)(ix), see § 31-16-101(a)(xx).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 31-16-111.
Limitations on establishing or relocating new vehicle dealers.

If a manufacturer seeks to enter into a franchise establishing an additional new vehicle dealer or relocating an existing new vehicle dealer within a radius of ten (10) miles from where the same line make is then represented the manufacturer shall in writing notify the department and each new vehicle dealer in that line make within a ten (10) mile radius of the intention to establish an additional dealer or to relocate an existing dealer within the ten (10) mile radius. Within twenty (20) days of receiving the notice or within twenty (20) days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the manufacturer, any new vehicle dealer notified may file with the department to protest the establishing or relocating of the new vehicle dealer. When a protest is filed, the department shall inform the manufacturer that a timely protest has been filed, and the manufacturer has forty-five (45) days to respond to the protest. The manufacturer shall not establish or relocate the proposed new vehicle dealer until the department has held a hearing under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, nor thereafter, if the department has determined that there is good cause for not permitting the addition or relocation of the new vehicle dealer which determination shall be made within sixty (60) days of receipt by the department of the response to the protest from the manufacturer. All hearing costs shall be borne as prescribed in W.S. 31-16-109(g).

This section does not apply:

To the relocation of an existing new vehicle dealer within that dealer’s relevant market area, provided that the relocation not be at a site within seven (7) miles of a new vehicle dealer for the same line make of vehicle;

If the proposed new vehicle dealer is to be established at or within two (2) miles of a location at which a former new vehicle dealer for the same line make had ceased operating within the previous two (2) years;

To the reopening of a new vehicle dealer who temporarily has been out of business;

If the protesting new vehicle dealer has not established to the department that he:

Is a licensed new motor vehicle dealer of the same line make located within ten (10) miles of the proposed location of the additional new vehicle dealer or of the proposed relocation site of an existing new vehicle dealer;

Is providing facilities, equipment, parts, capital and personnel in substantial compliance with its contractual obligations to the manufacturer; and

Has attained in the last three (3) years sales penetration for the manufacturer in his area of responsibility that is equal to or greater than the average penetration of all same line make new vehicle dealers in the state; or

Where the relocation is two (2) miles or less from the existing location of the relocating new vehicle dealer.

In determining whether good cause has been established for not entering into or relocating an additional new vehicle dealer for the same line make, the department shall take into consideration the existing circumstances including, but not limited to:

Permanency of the investment of both the existing and proposed new vehicle dealers;

Growth or decline in population and new motor vehicle registrations in the relevant market area;

Effect on the consuming public in the relevant market area;

Whether it is injurious or beneficial to the public welfare for an additional new vehicle dealer to be established;

Whether the new vehicle dealers of the same line make in that relevant market area are providing adequate competition and convenient customer care for the vehicles of the line make in the market area, including the adequacy of vehicle sales and service facilities, equipment, supply of vehicle parts and qualified service personnel;

Whether the establishment of an additional new vehicle dealer would increase competition and be in the public interest.

The protesting new vehicle dealer shall have the burden of establishing that good cause does not exist for the establishment of an additional new vehicle dealer or the relocation of an existing new vehicle dealer.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 31-16-112.
Penalty.

Any person, Wyoming based manufacturer, direct sale manufacturer, vehicle dealer, salesperson or agent who violates this act or any rule or regulation promulgated under this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

The highway patrol division and other enforcement officers as the department designates are charged with the duty of policing and enforcing the provisions of this act. The designated enforcement officers have authority to issue citations for violations of any of the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1; 2001, ch. 24, § 1; 2005, ch. 159, § 1; 2017 ch. 208, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (b), designating the existing provisions as (a).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a) added “direct sale manufacturer” toward the beginning.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 31-16-101(a)(xx).

Cited

in

Lariat Diesel Corp. v. Wyo. DOT, 2004 WY 25, 86 P.3d 266,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(2004).

§ 31-16-113.
Product liability responsibility.

A manufacturer shall file with the department a copy of the delivery and preparation obligations required to be performed by a new vehicle dealer prior to the delivery of a new vehicle to a buyer. These delivery and preparation obligations constitute the new vehicle dealer’s only responsibility for product liability as between the new vehicle dealer and the manufacturer, except for a loss caused by the new vehicle dealer’s failure to adhere to these obligations, a loss caused by the new vehicle dealer’s negligent, reckless or intentional misconduct or loss caused by the new vehicle dealer’s modification of a product without manufacturer’s authorization. Any mechanical, body or parts defects arising from an express or implied warranty of the manufacturer constitute the manufacturer’s product or warranty liability only as between the manufacturer and the new vehicle dealer. This section shall not affect the obligation of new vehicle dealers to perform warranty repair, other service and maintenance as may be required by law or contract.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

§ 31-16-114.
Product liability indemnification.

Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise agreement, no new vehicle manufacturer shall fail to indemnify and hold harmless its franchised new vehicle dealers against any judgment or settlement for damages including, but not limited to, court costs and reasonable attorney fees of the new vehicle dealer, arising out of complaints, claims or lawsuits including, but not limited to, strict liability, negligence, misrepresentation, warranty, express or implied, or rescission of the sale to the extent that the judgment or settlement relates to the alleged defective or negligent manufacture, assembly or design of new vehicles, parts or accessories or other functions by the manufacturer beyond the control of the new vehicle dealer. This section does not absolve any new vehicle dealer from responsibility for the negligent, reckless or intentional misconduct of the new vehicle dealer and his employees and agents.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

§ 31-16-115.
Disclosure of damage required.

On any new vehicle, any uncorrected damage or any corrected damage exceeding six percent (6%) of the manufacturer’s suggested retail price measured by the claim for reimbursement to the manufacturer or transportation or insurance carrier shall be disclosed in writing prior to delivery. Damage to glass, tire and bumpers and any damaged components, body panels, or options which can be replaced by identical components without welding are excluded from the six percent (6%) rule when replaced by identical manufacturer’s original equipment.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

§ 31-16-116.
Grounds for revocation; cessation of right to revocation.

Repaired damage to a customer-ordered new vehicle, not exceeding the six percent (6%) rule, does not constitute grounds for revocation of the customer order. The customer’s right of revocation ceases upon his acceptance of delivery of the vehicle if disclosure required in this act is made prior to delivery.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence, see § 31-16-101(a)(xx).

§ 31-16-117.
Payment for delivery preparation, warranty, sales incentives and service incentives.

Each new vehicle manufacturer shall specify in writing to each of its new vehicle dealers licensed in this state the dealer’s obligations for predelivery preparation and warranty service on its products, compensate the new vehicle dealer for service required of the dealer by the manufacturer and provide the dealer a schedule of compensation to be paid the dealer for parts, work and service in connection therewith, and the time allowance for the performance of that work and service.

No schedule of compensation shall fail to include reasonable compensation for diagnostic work, repair service and labor. Time allowances for the diagnosis and performance of warranty work and service shall be reasonable and adequate for the work to be performed. The hourly labor rate charged by the dealer for warranty service shall not exceed the hourly labor rate charged to nonwarranty customers for nonwarranty service and repairs, provided that rate is reasonable. Reimbursement for parts purchased by the dealer for use in performing work pursuant to a manufacturer’s express warranty shall be dealer cost plus thirty percent (30%).

No new vehicle manufacturer shall fail to perform any warranty obligations, fail to include in written notices of factory recalls to new vehicle owners and dealers, the expected date by which necessary parts and equipment will be available to dealers for the correction of those defects or fail to compensate any of the new vehicle dealers in this state for repairs affected by recall.

All claims made by new vehicle dealers for predelivery preparation, warranty, sales incentives or service incentives shall be paid or credited within thirty (30) days following their approval. The manufacturer may audit claims and charge the dealer for unsubstantiated or incorrect claims for a period of one (1) year following payment except where the manufacturer reasonably suspects fraud. A manufacturer that reasonably suspects fraud may audit claims for a period of four (4) years and charge the dealer for fraudulent claims as otherwise provided by law. All claims shall be either approved or disapproved within thirty (30) days after their receipt, on forms or by computerized communication and in the manner specified by the manufacturer including a computerized communications system. Any claim not specifically disapproved in writing or through electronic communication within thirty (30) days after receipt is construed to be approved and payment shall be made within thirty (30) days.

This section shall apply to each manufacturer or distributor of motor vehicles, medium duty or heavy duty truck components or engines who provides integral parts of vehicles or major components by selling directly to dealers or enters into a contract with a motor vehicle, medium duty or heavy duty truck dealer which authorizes the dealer to perform warranty or other services on products produced or distributed.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 98, § 1; 2005, ch. 159, § 1; 2019 ch. 89, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (d), rewrote the former second sentence as the present second and third sentences, decreasing the time for audit of unsubstantiated or incorrect claims and extending the time for audit where the manufacturer reasonably suspects fraud; and added (e).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (d), substituted "for predelivery preparation, warranty, sales incentives or service incentives" for "pursuant to this section for labor and parts" in the first sentence, and deleted the comma following "incorrect" in the second sentence.